District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2001

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 2, 39 DCR 9195
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 808, 42 DCR 3684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-321.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of chapter, see § 803 of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 41 DCR ).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary establishment, on an emergency basis due to Congressional review, of a health services planning and certificate of need regulatory program in the District of Columbia, see § 2-22 of the Health Services Planning Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-40, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2070).